nb: Raffineringsnivå: Extra virgin; Lett; Naturlig raffinert; Raffinert; Uraffinert; Virgin; Annet
hu: Finomítási szint: Extra szűz; Light; Természetesen finomított; Finomított; Finomítatlan; Szűz; Egyéb
tr: Rafine edilme seviyesi: Sızma; Hafif; Doğal rafine; Rafine; Rafine edilmemiş; Natürel; Diğer
cs: Úroveň rafinace: Extra panenský; Světlý; Přírodně rafinovaný; Rafinovaný; Nerafinovaný; Panenský; Ostatní
pt-PT: Nível de refinação: Virgem extra; Leve; Refinado naturalmente; Refinado; Não refinado; Virgem; Outro
fi: Jalostusaste: Ekstraneitsyt; Kevyt; Luonnollisesti puhdistettu; Puhdistettu; Puhdistamaton; Neitsyt; Muu
de: Raffinationsgrad: Nativ extra; Leicht; Natürlich raffiniert; Raffiniert; Unraffiniert; Nativ; Sonstige
zh-CN: 精炼程度: 特级初榨; 清淡; 天然精炼; 精炼; 未精炼; 初榨; 其他
pl: Stopień rafinacji: Extra virgin; Lekki; Naturalnie rafinowany; Rafinowany; Nierafinowany; Virgin; Inne
bg-BG: Ниво на прецизиране: Екстра върджин; Светло; Естествено рафинирано; Рафинирано; Нерафинирано; Върджин; Други
nl: Raffinageniveau: Extra vierge; Licht; Natuurlijk geraffineerd; Geraffineerd; Ongeraffineerd; Vierge; Overig
pt-BR: Refinamento nível: Extravirgem; Leve; Refinado naturalmente; Refinado; Não refinado; Virgem; Outro
el: Επίπεδο διευκόλυνσης: Εξαιρετικό παρθένο; Ελαφρύ; Φυσικά ραφιναρισμένο; Ραφιναρισμένο; Μη ραφιναρισμένο; Παρθένο; Άλλο
it: Livello di raffinatezza: Extravergine; Leggero; Naturalmente raffinato; Raffinato; Non raffinato; Vergine; Altro
da: Raffineringsniveau: Ekstra jomfru; Let; Naturligt raffineret; Raffineret; Uraffineret; Jomfru; Andet
ru: Степень рафинации: Extra virgin; Light; Натурального рафинирования; Рафинированное; Нерафинированное; Virgin; Другое
ro-RO: Nivel de rafinare: Extravirgin; Light; Rafinat natural; Rafinat; Nerafinat; Virgin; Altele
en: Refinement level: Extra virgin; Light; Naturally refined; Refined; Unrefined; Virgin; Other
hr-HR: Razina profinjenosti: Ekstra djevičansko; Lagano; Prirodno rafinirano; Rafinirano; Nerafinirano; Djevičansko; Ostalo
th: ระดับความละเอียด: เอ็กซ์ตร้าเวอร์จิ้น; ไลต์; ผ่านกรรมวิธีแบบธรรมชาติ; ผ่านกรรมวิธี; ไม่ผ่านกรรมวิธี; เวอร์จิ้น; อื่นๆ
vi: Mức độ tinh chế: Siêu nguyên chất; Nhẹ; Tinh luyện tự nhiên; Đã tinh luyện; Chưa tinh luyện; Nguyên chất; Khác
lt-LT: Rafinavimo lygis: Ypač tyras; Švelnus; Natūraliai rafinuotas; Rafinuotas; Nerafinuotas; Tyras; Kitas
zh-TW: 精製程度: 特級初榨; 清淡; 自然精煉; 精煉; 未精煉; 初榨; 其他
sl-SI: Stopnja prečiščenosti: Ekstra deviško; Svetlo; Naravno rafinirano; Rafinirano; Nerafinirano; Deviško; Drugo
ja: 精製レベル: エキストラバージン; ライト; 天然精製; 精製; 未精製; バージン; その他
sv: Förfiningsnivå: Extra virgin; Lätt; Naturligt raffinerad; Raffinerad; Oraffinerad; Virgin; Övrigt
fr: Degré de raffinage: Extra vierge; Légère; Naturellement raffinée; Raffinée; Non raffinée; Vierge; Autre
ko: 정제 수준: 엑스트라 버진; 라이트; 자연 정제; 정제; 비정제; 버진; 기타
es: Nivel de refinamiento: Virgen extra; Ligero; Refinado de forma natural; Refinado; Sin refinar; Virgen; Otro
sk-SK: Úroveň rafinácie: Extra panenský; Jemný; Prirodzene rafinovaný; Rafinovaný; Nerafinovaný; Panenský; Iné